Washington statutes.
RCW 44.04.125

Allowances of members-elect when attending meetings.

Each member-elect of the senate or house of representatives who attends any meeting of the legislature or any of its committees, upon the invitation of the committee on rules of his or her respective house, shall be entitled to receive per diem, mileage, and incidental expense allowances at the rates prescribed in chapter 44.04 RCW, as now or hereafter amended.

[ 1975 1st ex.s. c 185 s 1.]